California statutes. Civil Code
(3) When the tenant has abandoned or surrendered the premises.

(4) Pursuant to court order.

(5) For the purposes set forth in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1954.201).

(6) To comply with the provisions of Article 2.2 (commencing with Section 17973) of Chapter 5 of Part 1.5 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Except in cases of emergency or when the tenant has abandoned or surrendered the premises, entry may not be made during other than normal business hours unless the tenant consents to an entry during other than normal business hours at the time of
entry.

(c) The landlord may not abuse the right of access or use it to harass the tenant.

(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), or as provided in paragraph (2) or (3), the landlord shall give the tenant reasonable notice in writing of his or her intent to enter and enter only during normal business hours. The notice shall include the date, approximate time, and purpose of the entry. The notice may be personally delivered to the tenant, left with someone of a suitable age and discretion at the premises, or, left on, near, or under the usual entry door of the premises in a manner in which a reasonable person would discover the notice. Twenty-four hours shall be presumed to be reasonable notice in absence of evidence to the contrary. The notice may be mailed to the tenant. Mailing of the notice at least six days prior to an intended entry is presumed
reasonable notice in the absence of evidence to the contrary.

(2) If the purpose of the entry is to exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers, the notice may be given orally, in person or by telephone, if the landlord or his or her agent has notified the tenant in writing within 120 days of the oral notice that the property is for sale and that the landlord or agent may contact the tenant orally for the purpose described above. Twenty-four hours is presumed reasonable notice in the absence of evidence to the contrary. The notice shall include the date, approximate time, and purpose of the entry. At the time of entry, the landlord or agent shall leave written evidence of the entry inside the unit.

(3) The tenant and the landlord may agree orally to an entry to make agreed repairs or supply agreed services. The agreement shall include the date and approximate
time of the entry, which shall be within one week of the agreement. In this case, the landlord is not required to provide the tenant a written notice.

(e) No notice of entry is required under this section:

(1) To respond to an emergency.

(2) If the tenant is present and consents to the entry at the time of entry.

(3) After the tenant has abandoned or surrendered the unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.   (SB 721)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.05.

In any general assignment for the benefit of creditors, as defined in Section 493.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the assignee shall have the right to occupy, for a period of up to 90 days after the date of the assignment, any business premises held under a lease by the assignor upon payment when due of the monthly rental reserved in the lease for the period of such occupancy, notwithstanding any provision in the lease, whether heretofore or hereafter entered
into, for the termination thereof upon the making of the assignment or the insolvency of the lessee or other condition relating to the financial condition of the lessee. This section shall be construed as establishing the reasonable rental value of the premises recoverable by a landlord upon a holding-over by the tenant upon the termination of a lease under the circumstances specified herein.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1954.1 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 599, Sec. 2.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.06.

(a) As specified in subdivision (b), and except as provided in subdivision (j), beginning July 1, 2021, any landlord of an assisted housing development shall offer the tenant or tenants obligated on the lease of each unit in that housing development the option of having the tenant’s rental payment information reported to at least one nationwide consumer reporting agency that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681a(p)) or any other consumer reporting agency that meets the definition in Section 603(f) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681a(f)) so long as the consumer reporting agency resells or otherwise furnishes rental payment information to a nationwide consumer reporting agency that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of the federal
 Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681a(p)). A tenant’s election to have rent reported under this subdivision shall be in writing, as described in subdivision (c).

(b) For leases entered into on and after July 1, 2021, the offer of rent reporting shall be made at the time of the lease agreement and at least once annually thereafter. For leases outstanding as of July 1, 2021, the offer of rent reporting shall be made no later than October 1, 2021, and at least once annually thereafter.

(c) Upon the agreement of the tenant, the landlord may provide the offer of rent reporting to the tenant by first-class United States mail or email. The offer of rent reporting shall include a written election of rent reporting that contains all of the following:

(1) A statement that reporting of the tenant’s rental payment
 information is optional.

(2) Identification of each consumer reporting agency to which rental payment information will be reported.

(3) If applicable, a statement that all of the tenant’s rental payments will be reported, regardless of whether the payments are timely, late, or missed.

(4) The amount of any fee charged pursuant to subdivision (f).

(5) Instructions on how to submit the written election of rent reporting to the landlord by first-class United States mail or email.

(6) A statement that the tenant may opt into rent reporting at any time following the initial offer by the landlord.

(7) A statement that the tenant
 may elect to stop rent reporting at any time, but that they will not be able to resume rent reporting for at least six months after their election to opt out.

(8) Instructions on how to opt out of reporting rental payment information.

(9) A signature block that the tenant shall date and sign in order to accept the offer of rent reporting.

(d) If the offer of rent reporting is made by first-class United States mail, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a self-addressed, stamped envelope to return the written election of rent reporting.

(e) The written election to begin rent reporting shall not be accepted from the tenant at the time of the offer. A tenant may submit their completed written election of rent reporting at any time after they receive
 the offer of rent reporting from the landlord. A tenant may request and shall obtain additional copies of the written election of rent reporting form from the landlord at any time.

(f) If a tenant elects to have that tenant’s rental payments reported to a consumer reporting agency under subdivision (a), the landlord may require that tenant to pay a fee not to exceed the lesser of the actual cost to the landlord to provide the service or ten dollars ($10) per month. The payment or nonpayment of this fee by the tenant shall not be reported to a consumer reporting agency.

(g) If a tenant fails to pay any fee required by the landlord pursuant to subdivision (f), all of the following shall apply:

(1) The failure to pay the fee shall not be cause for termination of the tenancy, whether pursuant to Section 1161 of the Code
 of Civil Procedure or otherwise.

(2) The landlord shall not deduct the unpaid fee from the tenant’s security deposit.

(3) If the fee remains unpaid for 30 days or more, the landlord may stop reporting the tenant’s rental payments and the tenant shall be unable to elect rent reporting again for a period of six months from the date on which the fee first became due.

(h) A tenant who elects to have rent reported as described in subdivision (a) may subsequently file a written request with their landlord to stop that reporting with which the landlord shall comply. A tenant who elects to stop reporting shall not be allowed to elect rent reporting again for a period of at least six months from the date of the tenant’s written request to stop reporting.

(i) A
 tenant who elects to have rent reported does not forfeit any rights under Sections 1941 to 1942, inclusive. If a tenant makes deductions from rent or otherwise withholds rent as authorized by those sections, the deductions or withholding of rent shall not constitute a late rental payment. A tenant invoking the right to repair and deduct or withhold rent under those sections shall notify their landlord of the deduction or withholding prior to the date rent is due. This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a housing provider of the obligation to maintain habitable premises.

(j) This section shall not apply to any landlord of an assisted housing development that contains 15 or fewer dwelling units, unless both of the following apply:

(1) The landlord owns more than one assisted housing development, regardless of the number of units in each assisted housing development.

(2) The landlord is one of the following:

(A) A real estate investment trust, as defined in Section 856 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(B) A corporation.

(C) A limited liability company in which at least one member is a corporation.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Assisted housing development” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65863.10 of the Government Code.

(2) “Landlord” means an owner of residential real property containing five or more dwelling units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 519, Sec. 1.   (SB 924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.07.

(a) As specified in subdivision (b), and except as provided in subdivision (j), any landlord of a dwelling unit of residential real property shall offer any tenant obligated on the lease the option of having the tenant’s positive rental payment information reported to at least one nationwide consumer reporting agency that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p)) or any other consumer reporting agency that meets the definition in Section 603(f) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(f)) as long as the consumer reporting agency resells or otherwise furnishes rental payment information to a nationwide consumer reporting agency that meets the
 definition in Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p)).

(b) For leases entered into on and after April 1, 2025, the offer of positive rental payment information reporting shall be made at the time of the lease agreement and at least once annually thereafter. For leases outstanding as of January 1, 2025, the offer of positive rental payment information reporting shall be made no later than April 1, 2025, and at least once annually thereafter.

(c) A landlord may provide the offer of positive rental payment information reporting required by subdivision (a) to the tenant by first-class United States mail or email.

(d) The offer of positive rental payment information reporting shall include
 a written election of positive rental payment information reporting that contains all of the following:

(1) A statement that reporting of the tenant’s positive rental payment information is optional.

(2) Identification of each consumer reporting agency to which positive rental payment information will be reported.

(3) The amount of any fee charged pursuant to subdivision (g).

(4) Instructions on how to submit the written election of positive rental payment information reporting to the landlord by first-class United States mail or email.

(5) A statement that the tenant may opt into positive rental payment
 information reporting at any time following the initial offer by the landlord.

(6) A statement that the tenant may elect to stop positive rental payment information reporting at any time, but that the tenant will not be able to resume positive rental payment information reporting for at least six months after the election to opt out.

(7) Instructions on how to opt out of positive rental payment information reporting.

(8) A signature block that the tenant shall date and sign in order to accept the offer of positive rental payment information reporting.

(e) If the offer of positive rental payment information
 reporting is made by first-class United States mail, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a self-addressed, stamped envelope to return the written election of positive rental payment information reporting.

(f) (1) A tenant may submit the tenant’s completed written election of rent reporting at any time after the tenant receives the offer of positive rental payment information reporting from the landlord.

 (2) (A) A tenant may request additional copies of the written election of positive rental payment information reporting from the landlord at any time.

(B) A landlord that receives a request from a tenant pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with the
 request.

(g) (1) If a tenant elects to have that tenant’s positive rental payment information reported to a consumer reporting agency under subdivision (a), the landlord may require that tenant to pay a fee not to exceed the lesser of the actual cost to the landlord to provide the service or ten dollars ($10) per month. If the landlord does not incur any actual cost to report positive rental payment information, no amount shall be charged from the tenant. The payment or nonpayment of this fee by the tenant shall not be reported to a consumer reporting agency.

(2) An amount tendered in full or partial
 satisfaction of rent or any other obligation under the lease, however designated by the party tendering the payment, shall not be applied or credited to the fee authorized by this subdivision.

(h) If a tenant fails to pay any fee required by the landlord pursuant to subdivision (g), all of the following shall apply:

(1) The failure to pay the fee shall not be cause for termination of the tenancy, whether pursuant to Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure or otherwise.

(2) The landlord shall not deduct the unpaid fee from the tenant’s security deposit.

(3) If the fee remains unpaid for 30 days or more, the landlord may stop reporting the tenant’s rental
 payments, and the tenant shall not elect positive rental payment information reporting again for a period of six months from the date on which the fee first became due.

(i) A tenant who elects to have positive rental payment information reported as described in subdivision (a) may subsequently file a written request with the tenant’s landlord to stop that reporting with which the landlord shall comply. A tenant who elects to stop reporting shall not be allowed to elect positive rental payment information reporting again for a period of at least six months from the date of the tenant’s written request to stop reporting.

(j) This section shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) A landlord of a
 residential rental building that contains 15 or fewer dwelling units, unless both of the following apply:

(A) The landlord owns more than one residential rental building, regardless of the number of units in each building.

(B) The landlord is one of the following:

(i) A real estate investment trust, as defined in Section 856 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(ii) A corporation.

(iii) A limited liability company in which at least one member is a corporation.

(2) An assisted housing development, as defined in Section 65863.10 of the
 Government Code.

(k) A tenant who elects to have rent reported does not forfeit any rights under Sections 1941 to 1942, inclusive. If a tenant makes deductions from rent or otherwise withholds rent as authorized by those sections, the deductions or withholding of rent shall not constitute a late rental payment. A tenant invoking the right to repair and deduct or withhold rent under those sections shall notify the tenant’s landlord of the deduction or withholding prior to the date rent is due. This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve a housing provider of the obligation to maintain habitable premises.

(l) (1) As used in this section, “positive rental payment information” means information regarding a tenant’s complete, timely payments of rent.

 (2) “Positive rental payment information” does not include an instance in which a tenant did not completely or timely make a rental payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.071.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Disaster” means an event or circumstance that results in a federal major disaster declaration approved by the President of the United States or a state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code.

(2) “Lodging” means any of the following:

(A) A motel.

(B) A hotel.

(C) A property that meets either of the following conditions:

(i) If a local government had a registration, licensure, or similar requirement for short-term lodgings of 30 days or less on the date the disaster was declared or proclaimed, the property was in compliance with that requirement on that date.

(ii) If a local government did not have a registration, licensure, or similar requirement for short-term lodgings on the date the disaster was declared or proclaimed, the property met the definition of “short-term lodging,” as defined in Section 17568.8 of the Business and Professions Code, on that date.

(b) A guest residing in a lodging shall not be considered a person who hires pursuant to Section 1940, nor have
 their lodging constitute a new tenancy for the purposes of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure, until the guest has resided in the lodging for 270 days, if the guest is residing in the lodging as a result of a disaster that substantially damaged, destroyed, or otherwise made uninhabitable their prior housing.

(c) If, before or at the time
 of check-in for a stay that would result in the guest residing in a lodging for more than 30 consecutive days, the lodging believes that the guest is subject to subdivision (b), the lodging shall provide the following notice in physical or electronic written form, in at least 12-point type or
 substantially the same form:
“NOTICE FROM THE STATE OF CALIFORNIA:

Under California law, if you are staying here because your home has been damaged, destroyed, or made uninhabitable because of a disaster, state law will not consider you a tenant unless you have stayed here for 270 consecutive days or
 more. If you have been displaced by a disaster and you stay here for more than 30 days but have not yet stayed here for 270 consecutive days, the lodging is not required to extend your reservation but must give you 72 hours notice before requiring you to leave, subject to certain conditions.

You are being provided with this notice because the operator of this establishment believes you are
 staying here because you were displaced by a disaster and thus that, if you stay beyond 30 days, the above-described rules will apply to your stay until your stay lasts for 270 days or more.”
(d) (1) After providing the notice described in subdivision (c), the lodging shall provide the guest with a confirmation form with the option to physically or electronically check one of the following statements:

(A) “I have read the provided notice and confirm that I am checking into this lodging or extending my stay because my home has been substantially damaged, destroyed, or made uninhabitable by a disaster and acknowledge that I will not be considered a tenant unless I have stayed
 here for 270 consecutive days.”

(B) “I have read the provided notice and confirm that I am not checking into this lodging or extending my stay because my home has been substantially damaged, destroyed, or made uninhabitable by a disaster and acknowledge this does not apply to me.”

(2) If a guest fails or refuses to select either of the statements specified in paragraph (1), the lodging may rely on other reasonable information to determine that a guest is subject to subdivision (b).

(3) If a guest fails or refuses to select either of the statements specified in paragraph (1), the lodging may limit the duration of stay or refuse to provide the guest accommodations.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), if a guest who is subject to subdivision (b) has resided in a lodging for more than 30 days, the lodging operator shall provide a written notice to the guest at least 72 hours before requiring the guest to vacate the lodging.

(2) A lodging shall not be required to provide a guest who is subject to subdivision (b) the notice described in paragraph (1) prior to requiring the guest to vacate the lodging if any of the following apply:

(A) The guest fails at any time to pay when due all room charges, fees, expenses, and other amounts owing.

(B) The guest interferes with the quiet enjoyment of other guests at the lodging.

(C) The lodging has reasonable grounds to believe that the guest has damaged, is damaging, or will damage any lodging or other property.

(D) The lodging has reasonable grounds to believe that the guest poses a risk of harm to other guests, employees, or others lawfully on the lodging property.

(f) This section does not apply to a guest residing in a lodging for a reason other than a disaster substantially damaging, destroying, or otherwise making uninhabitable their prior housing.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   (AB 299)   Effective October 10, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.4. Occupancy in Interim Homelessness Programs [1954.08. - 1954.092.]

1954.08.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Harm-reduction” means a set of strategies, policies, and practices aimed at mitigating the negative social and physical consequences associated with various human behaviors, including, but not limited to, substance use, and that do not rely on punitive measures to gain program compliance.

(b) “Motel or hotel” means any hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other similar transient lodging establishment.

(c) “Self-exit” means when a shelter program participant voluntarily leaves a shelter program, including for a reason unknown to the shelter program operator, and does not return to the
 site or make reasonable contact with the shelter program operator within 72 hours of leaving. The shelter program operator shall contact hospitals, jails, and any other relevant sites to make a good faith effort to determine the location of the individual and if their exit from the program was voluntary.

(d) “Shelter program” means a city-, county-, continuum of care-, state-, or federally funded shelter, interim housing, motel voucher, or emergency shelter program in which the city, county, continuum of care, state, or federal governmental entity retains an oversight and accountability role in ensuring compliance with program regulations and proper program administration.

(e) “Shelter program administrator” means a city, county, or continuum of care entity that retains an oversight role in ensuring compliance with program regulations and proper program administration.

(f) “Shelter program operator” means a service provider agency that is contracting with a shelter program administrator to carry out the operations of the shelter program. A “shelter program operator” may include community-based service providers as well as public government agencies carrying out program operations.

(g) “Shelter program participant” means an occupant of a motel, hotel, or other shelter site whose occupancy is solely due to their participation in a shelter program.

(h) “Trauma-informed” means a set of practices that promote safety, empowerment, and healing in recognition that program participants may have experienced trauma that informs their experiences and responses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.   (AB 2835)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.09.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1954.091, shelter program participants shall not have their continued occupancy in a motel, hotel, or shelter program constitute a new tenancy and shall not be considered persons who hire pursuant to Section 1940 for the purposes of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the shelter program meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The shelter program adheres to the core components of Housing First, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8255 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The shelter program establishes, adopts, and clearly documents rules governing how and for what reasons a shelter program participant’s
 enrollment may be terminated and the shelter program operator discloses the termination policy to program participants in writing, in plain language, at the commencement of their occupancy.

(A) Permissible reasons for termination shall include sexual assault, verbally or physically threatening behaviors that rise to the level of a “direct threat” to persons or property as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12179 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, physical violence to staff, hotel guests, or other program participants, direct observation of participant engaging in illegal activity onsite, or time limits established by the shelter program.

(B) Terminations for reasons not stated in subparagraph (A) and any operational policies negotiated prior to the commencement of the shelter program shall be approved by the shelter program administrator and
 shared with their shelter program participants in a clearly labeled document.

(C) The shelter program administrator shall endeavor to ensure terminations are performed by the shelter program operator in a trauma-informed manner utilizing a harm-reduction approach, and shall ensure that the termination policies and procedures of the hotel, motel, and shelter program, including the required grievance procedure, comply with all applicable disability laws, including requirements for reasonable accommodation.

(D) The shelter program operator is exempt from providing a 30-day notice pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) if the shelter program participant has self-exited from the program.

(E) If a shelter program participant will exit from the program due to time limits and the participant’s stay is extended for a
 period of less than 30 days beyond the original termination date, the shelter program administrator or shelter program operator may issue an amended termination notice with an additional period of time equal to the number of days of the program extension.

(3) The shelter program administrator establishes procedures regarding how a shelter program participant will be provided a written termination notice if a termination occurs and the shelter program operator discloses those procedures to shelter program participants in writing at the commencement of their occupancy.

(A) The shelter program operator shall provide the termination notice to the participant at least 30 days prior to the proposed termination or, if the underlying cause for a proposed termination constitutes a “direct threat,” as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12179 of Title 2 of the Code of
 California Regulations, the shelter program operator may remove the participant from the premises immediately, provided that the operator advises the participant of their right to utilize the grievance process described in paragraph (5).

(B) The termination notice shall contain a clear, plain-language statement of the reason for the termination, shall notify the participant of their right to request a reasonable accommodation if they are a qualified person with a disability, and shall notify the participant of their right to utilize the grievance process described in paragraph (5).

(C) The established procedures developed regarding participant guideline violations shall include an escalation continuum that incorporates documented warnings and documented shelter program operator staff and participant problem solving methods prior to instituting terminations from the shelter
 program.

(4) The shelter program operator shall provide an exit plan upon termination of a shelter program participant that includes referrals to any available local shelter service for which the participant is eligible and the shelter program operator shall make a good faith, reasonable effort to facilitate an intake for that participant in an available bed or unit.

(A) The shelter program operator shall document good faith, reasonable efforts and shall make that documentation available upon request.

(B) The shelter program administrator, in cases where the grievance process is utilized, shall determine whether the shelter program operator’s efforts constitute a good faith effort to facilitate a participant into an alternative available shelter site or program.

(C) (i) The shelter program administrator shall make good faith efforts to provide reasonable transportation accommodations upon termination of a shelter program participant from a program or upon transfer of a shelter program participant to an alternative available bed or unit.

(ii) In exigent circumstances that necessitate the presence of first responders, police, or fire department and render it infeasible to provide a termination letter at that time or coordinate a postexit plan, the shelter program operator shall create a termination letter that satisfies the above-described requirements and make that documentation available to participants within 24 hours of their request.

(5) The shelter program administrator shall establish a grievance process that complies with due process and the shelter program operator shall disclose the grievance
 process to occupants in writing, in plain language, at the commencement of their occupancy.

(A) The grievance process shall give shelter program participants a right to due process appeal through the shelter program administrator if the shelter program participant believes they were or are being wrongfully terminated from the program, and shall inform shelter program participants on how to access and initiate the grievance process.

(B) (i) Program participants shall be provided the opportunity to initiate the grievance process 30 days prior to their proposed termination date or at any point thereafter.

(ii) In cases where participants are subject to immediate removal based on circumstances that present a “direct threat,” as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12179 of Title 2
 of the California Code of Regulations, participants shall be provided the opportunity to initiate the grievance process at the time of removal or at any point thereafter.

(C) If, following the grievance process, the proposed termination is not carried out, any participant already removed shall be granted the right to resume their participation in the program. If the shelter program operator is unable to place the individual in the original site, the shelter program operator shall facilitate a placement for the individual in an alternative available motel, hotel, or shelter site.

(b) Where a shelter program administrator is also the shelter program operator, the shelter program administrator is responsible for all of the duties described in subdivision (a).

(c) For properties that are being converted from use as a
 motel or hotel, or from use as a shelter, interim housing, emergency shelter, or other interim facility to a permanent housing site, paragraph (2) shall not apply to occupants of the site from the date that the site receives a certificate of occupancy as a permanent housing site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 30.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.091.

(a) Section 310.3 of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 301.1) of Part 2 of Title 24 (the California Building Standards Code) of the California Code of Regulations shall not be interpreted to restrict the duration of occupancy for shelter program participants.

(b) (1) This chapter shall not be interpreted to either confer or deny any tenant rights or protections for persons who hire pursuant to Section 1940, or any rights that the tenant may otherwise be entitled to under any applicable federal, state, or local law.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a shelter program participant of
 a shelter program that complies with the requirements described in Section 1954.09 shall be entitled to all of the following:

(A) A shelter program participant’s continued occupancy in a motel or hotel does not constitute a new tenancy.

(B) A shelter program participant shall not be considered a person who hires pursuant to Section 1940 for the purposes of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(C) Receipt of a written termination policy.

(D) Disclosure of a termination notice procedure.

(E) Thirty days’ notice prior to termination, except as described in Section 1954.09.

(F) Right to appeal termination pursuant to the grievance policy required by Section 1954.09.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.   (AB 1991)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.092.

(a) A motel or hotel shall not be designated as a nontransient motel or a nontransient hotel pursuant to Section 310.4 of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 301.1) of Part 2 of Title 24 (the California Building Standards Code) of the California Code of Regulations solely as a result of a shelter program participant’s occupancy in the motel or hotel beyond a 30-day period.

(b) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1954.09, a hotel or motel shall not do either of the following:

(1) (A) Adopt termination policies specifically for motel or hotel occupants who are shelter program participants that do not apply to other motel or hotel
 occupants who are not participating in a shelter program, impose restrictions on the ability of program participants to freely enter or exit the property or access certain areas or amenities of the property that do not apply to other motel or hotel occupants, or levy charges and fees, including fees for room card replacements, that do not apply to other motel or hotel occupants.

(B) This paragraph sets minimum standards for shelter program terminations and shall not be construed to restrict shelter program operating standards that confer greater rights to participants with regard to shelter program terminations.

(2) Require shelter program participants to check out and reregister, move out of rooms or between rooms, or from the hotel or motel while actively enrolled in the shelter program for the purposes of preventing an occupant from establishing rights of
 tenancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 209, Sec. 3.   (AB 2835)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Transitional Housing Participant Misconduct [1954.10. - 1954.18.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [1954.10. - 1954.12.]

1954.10.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Transitional Housing Participant Misconduct Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.11.

In enacting this chapter, it is the intent of the Legislature to prevent the recurrence of acts of substantial disruption or violence by participants in transitional housing programs against other such participants, program staff, or immediate neighbors of the participants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.12.

The following definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Abuse” means intentionally or recklessly causing or attempting to cause bodily injury, or sexual assault or placing another person in reasonable apprehension of imminent serious bodily injury to himself, herself, or another, where the injured person is another participant, program operator’s staff, or a person residing within 100 feet of
 the program site.

(b) “Homeless person” means an individual or family who, prior to participation in a transitional housing program, either lacked a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence or had a primary nighttime residence, that was one of the following:

(1) A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations, including, but not limited to, welfare hotels, congregate shelters, and transitional housing for the mentally ill.

(2) An institution that provides a temporary residence for individuals intended to be institutionalized.

(3) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.

(c) “Participant” means a homeless person under contract with a program operator to participate in a transitional housing program and to use a dwelling unit in the program site. For the purposes of naming a defendant under this part, or a person to be protected under this part, “participant” shall include a person living with a participant at the program site. The contract shall specifically include the transitional housing program rules and regulations, a statement of the program operator’s right of control over and access to the program unit occupied by the participant, and a restatement of the requirements and procedures of this chapter.

(d) “Program misconduct” means any intentional violation of the transitional housing program rules and regulations which (1) substantially interferes with the orderly operation of the transitional housing program, and (2) relates to drunkenness on
 the program site, unlawful use or sale of controlled substances, theft, arson, or destruction of the property of the program operator, persons living within 100 feet of the program site, program employees, or other participants, or (3) relates to violence or threats of violence, and harassment of persons living within 100 feet of the program site, program employees, or of other participants.

(e) “Program operator” means a governmental agency, or private nonprofit corporation receiving any portion of its transitional housing program funds from a governmental agency, which is operating a transitional housing program. “Program operator” also includes any other manager or operator hired by a governmental agency or nonprofit corporation to operate its transitional housing program.

(f) “Program site” means the real property containing a dwelling unit, the use of which is granted to a
 participant, and other locations where program activities or services are carried out or provided, subject to the participant’s compliance with the transitional housing program rules and regulations.
